Utah statutes.
76-8-1201.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Client" means a person who receives or has received public assistance.
(2)  "Overpayment" means the same as that term is defined in Section
35A-3-602.
(3)  "Provider" means the same as that term is defined in Section 62A-11-103.
(4)  "Public assistance" means the same as that term is defined in Section
35A-1-102.
